Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB39.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 914. Possession of firearm or other dangerous weapon in public recreation area.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if the person:(1) knowingly possesses a firearm or other dangerous weapon in a public recreation area or knowingly causes a firearm or other dangerous weapon to be present in a public recreation area; or(2) knowingly possesses a firearm or other dangerous weapon in a public recreation area with the intent that the firearm or other dangerous weapon be used in the commission 12345678910111213141516171819 of a crime or knowingly causes a firearm or other dangerous weapon to be present in a public recreation area with the intent that the firearm or other dangerous weapon be used in the commission of a crime.(b) Grading.--(1) An offense under subsection (a)(1) is a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) An offense under subsection (a)(2) is a misdemeanor of the first degree.(c) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to:(1) The lawful performance of official duties by an officer, agent or employee of the United States, the Commonwealth or a political subdivision who is authorized by law to engage in or supervise the prevention, detection, investigation or prosecution of a violation of law.(2) The carrying of a rifle or shotgun by an instructor or participant in a course of instruction provided by the Pennsylvania Game Commission under 34 Pa.C.S. § 2704 (relating to eligibility for license).(3) An association of veteran soldiers and its auxiliaries or members of the armed forces of the United States or the Commonwealth, including a reserve component, when engaged in the performance of ceremonial duties with county approval.(d) Private recreation area.--Nothing in this section may be construed to restrict the rights of the owner of a private recreation area to implement policies relating to dangerous weapons in the private recreation area.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20250SB0039PN0018 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection:"Dangerous weapon." Any of the following when possessed with intent to use or to provide the material to commit an offense graded as a misdemeanor of the third degree or higher:(1) A bomb.(2) An explosive or incendiary device.(3) A grenade.(4) A blackjack.(5) Metal knuckles.(6) A dagger.(7) A knife, the blade of which is exposed in an automatic way by switch, push-button, spring mechanism or otherwise.(8) Any other implement for the infliction of serious bodily injury that serves no common lawful purpose."Firearm." A weapon, including a starter gun, designed to expel a projectile or projectiles by the action of an explosion, expansion of gas or escape of gas. The term does not include a device designed or used exclusively for the firing of stud cartridges, explosive rivets or similar industrial ammunition."Private recreation area." A park, recreation center or pool owned or operated by a private entity."Public recreation area." A public park, recreation center or a pool owned or operated by a political subdivision.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0039PN0018 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425